02_Morphology/telugu.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<noun%>
%<singular%>
%<plural%>
%<nominative%>
%<genitive%>

LEXICON Root

ఇల్లు%<noun%>          :ఇల్లు    NForms ; ! House
పుస్తకం%<noun%>        :పుస్తకం  NForms ; ! Book
కుర్రాడు%<noun%>       :కుర్రాడు  NForms ; ! Boy
అమ్మాయి%<noun%>        :అమ్మాయి  NForms ; ! Girl
వంటి%<noun%>           :వంటి     NForms ; ! Insect
చెట్టు%<noun%>          :చెట్టు    NForms ; ! Tree
నది%<noun%>            :నది      NForms ; ! River
కొండ%<noun%>           :కొండ      NForms ; ! Mountain
పట్టణం%<noun%>         :పట్టణం   NForms ; ! Town
కారు%<noun%>           :కారు     NForms ; ! Car
గుర్రం%<noun%>          :గుర్రం    NForms ; ! Horse
పని%<noun%>            :పని      NForms ; ! Work
పెన్సిల్%<noun%>        :పెన్సిల్  NForms ; ! Pencil
బల్ల%<noun%>           :బల్ల      NForms ; ! Ball
చేప%<noun%>            :చేప      NForms ; ! Fish
గుడి%<noun%>           :గుడి      NForms ; ! Temple
పూవు%<noun%>           :పూవు     NForms ; ! Flower
ఫలం%<noun%>            :ఫలం      NForms ; ! Fruit
బాట%<noun%>            :బాట      NForms ; ! Path
చీర%<noun%>            :చీర      NForms ; ! Saree

LEXICON NForms

%<singular%>%<nominative%>: # ;      ! Singular Nominative
%<singular%>%<genitive%>:ను # ;      ! Singular Genitive (for words ending in vowels)
                           :ది # ;    ! Singular Genitive (for words ending in consonants)

END
